dev/xfst2apertium.useless.generation.twol
! This file turns
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+Use%/Sub+N+SgGenCmp+Use%/Circ#+Use%/Circgiella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+Use%/Sub+N+SgGenCmp+Use%/Circ#+Use%/Circgiella+N+Sg+Gen+Use%/NG
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+Use%/Sub+N+SgGenCmp+Use%/Circ#+Use%/Circgiella+N+Sg+Acc
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+PlGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp+Use%/Circ#+Use%/Circgiella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+PlGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp+Use%/Circ#+Use%/Circgiella+N+Sg+Gen+Use%/NG
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+PlGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp+Use%/Circ#+Use%/Circgiella+N+Sg+Acc
!    sámegiela       sáme#giella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sáme#giella+N+Sg+Gen+Use%/NG
!    sámegiela       sáme#giella+N+Sg+Acc
! into
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Acc
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+PlGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+PlGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Acc
!    sámegiela       sáme#giella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sáme#giella+N+Sg+Acc
! and
!    vuođđogeađggit  vuođđu+N+SgNomCmp+Use%/Circ#+Use%/Circgeađgi+N+Pl+Nom
!    vuođđogeađggit  vuođđo+Use%/Sub+Use%/Circ#+Use%/Circgeađgi+N+Pl+Nom
! into
!    vuođđogeađggit  vuođđu+N+SgNomCmp#geađgi+N+Pl+Nom
!    vuođđogeađggit  vuođđo#geađgi+N+Pl+Nom

Alphabet

%+Last:0
%+Use%/NG:0
%+Use%/Ped:0
%+Use%/Sub:0
%+Use%/Circ:0
%+Use%/CircN:0
%+Use%/Marg:0
%+Dial%/%-KJ:0
%+Dial%/%-GG:0
%+Dial%/%-GS:0
;


Sets

Useless =
%+Last
%+Use%/NG
%+Use%/Ped	
%+Use%/Sub	
%+Use%/Circ	
%+Use%/CircN	
%+Use%/Marg	
%+Use%/NG	
%+Dial%/%-KJ	
%+Dial%/%-GG	
%+Dial%/%-GS	
;

!%+Dial%/%-GG
Uselesspaths = 
%+Use%/NG
%+Use%/Sub
%+Use%/NG
%+Dial%/%-KJ
%+Dial%/%-GS
;

Rules 

"Try again"
Uselesspaths:0 /<= _ ;

"Delete Use-tags etc. that we don't use"
Useless:0 <=> _ ; 
! Removing tags with hfst-substitute will give duplicate analyses, so
! we do it here instead
